tables/fil-ueb-g2.ctb
midword bubu 5-46-12
midword dudu 5-46-145
midword gugu 5-46-1245
midword huhu 5-46-125
midword kuku 5-46-13
midword lulu 5-46-123
midword mumu 5-46-134
midword nunu 5-46-1345
midword pupu 5-46-1234
midword ruru 5-46-1235
midword susu 5-46-234
midword wuwu 5-46-2456
midword yuyu 5-46-13456

midword bububu 5-56-12
midword dududu 5-56-145
midword gugugu 5-56-1245
midword huhuhu 5-56-125
midword kukuku 5-56-13
midword lululu 5-56-123
midword mumumu 5-56-134
midword nununu 5-56-1345
midword pupupu 5-56-1234
midword rururu 5-56-1235
midword sususu 5-56-234
midword tututu 5-56-2345
midword wuwuwu 5-56-2456
midword yuyuyu 5-56-13456

# Miscellaneous

# Beginning of Word

# End of Word

# Middle and End of Word

midendword ing 346

# Word or End of Word

prfword ban 12-156
prfword baw 12-246
prfword gan 1245-156

# Part Word

partword kara 25-1235-1

# Always

always bang 12-2346
always bar 12-345
always dang 145-2346
always dar 145-345
always gang 1245-2346
always inin 35-24-1345
always inin 35-24-1345
always inin 35-24-1345
always kant 13-156-2345
always kar 13-345
always karan 25-1235-156
always par 1234-345

# Stand Alone 

match %[^_~]%<* kara (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 25-1235-1
